Utah statutes.
16-10a-725.   Quorum and voting requirements for voting groups.
(1)  Shares entitled to vote as a separate voting group may take action on a
matter at a meeting only if a quorum of those shares exists with respect to
that matter.  Unless the articles of incorporation or this chapter provide
otherwise, a majority of the votes entitled to be cast on the matter by the
voting group constitutes a quorum of that voting group for action on that
matter.
(2)  Once a share is represented for any purpose at a meeting, including the
purpose of determining that a quorum exists, it is deemed present for quorum
purposes for the remainder of the meeting and for any adjournment of that
meeting, unless a new record date is or must be set for that adjourned
meeting.
(3)  If a quorum exists, action on a matter, other than the election of
directors, by a voting group is approved if the votes cast within the voting
group favoring the action exceed the votes cast within the voting group
opposing the action, unless the articles of incorporation or this chapter
requires a greater number of affirmative votes.
(4)  The election of directors is governed by Section 16-10a-728.
